Maryland, session 2026, SB0623.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis
4–204.

SENATE BILL 623 3
(a) Except as otherwise provided in Division II of this article and subsection (b)
of this section, a local licensing board may not issue more than one license for use at the
same premises.
(b) The prohibition in subsection (a) of this section does not apply to a license
issued in accordance with §§ 4–1201 through 4–1205 of this title.
4–1002.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “OTHER TOBACCO PRODUCTS” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
16.5–101 OF THE BUSINESS REGULATION ARTICLE “SOCIAL EQUITY APPLICANT”
MEANS AN APPLICANT FOR A CLASS C–PCL LICENSE THAT HAS AT LEAST 65%
OWNERSHIP AND CONTROL HELD BY ONE OR MORE INDIVIDUALS WHO:
(I) HAVE LIVED IN A DISPROPORTIONATELY IMPACTED AREA
FOR AT LEAST 5 OF THE 10 YEARS IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING THE SUBMISSION OF
THE APPLICATION;
(II) ATTENDED A PUBLIC SCHOOL IN A DISPROPORTIONATELY
IMPACTED AREA FOR AT LEAST 5 YEARS; OR
(III) FOR AT LEAST 2 YEARS, ATTENDED A 4–YEAR INSTITUTION
OF HIGHER EDUCATION IN THE STATE WHERE AT LEAST 40% OF THE INDIVIDUALS
WHO ATTEND THE INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION ARE ELIGIBLE FOR A PELL
GRANT.
(3) “TOBACCONIST” MEANS A RETAIL TOBACCO BUSINESS THAT
HOLDS A TOBACCONIST LICENSE UNDER § 16.5–204 OF THE BUSINESS REGULATION
ARTICLE.
(B) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY IN MONTGOMERY COUNTY.
(C) THERE IS A CLASS C–PCL (PREMIUM CIGAR LOUNGE) LICENSE.
(C) (D) (1) A LOCAL LICENSING BOARD MAY ISSUE THE LICENSE TO A
TOBACCONIST IF:
(I) THE TOBACCONIST OPERATES AN ESTABLISHMENT IN
WHICH PREMIUM CIGARS AND PIPE TOBACCO ARE SOLD AT RETAIL FOR
ON–PREMISES AND OFF–PREMISES USE; AND

SENATE BILL 623
(II) THE TOBACCONIST MEETS THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS
SECTION.
(2) (I) A LOCAL LICENSING BOARD MAY NOT ISSUE MORE THAN
TWO NEW CLASS C–PCL LICENSES IN A SINGLE JURISDICTION DURING A CALENDAR
YEAR.
(II) 1. A SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPHS (III) AND (IV) OF
THIS PARAGRAPH, A LOCAL LICENSING BOARD MAY ISSUE ONE CLASS C–PCL
LICENSE PER 150,000 RESIDENTS OF A COUNTY.
(II) 2. IF A COUNTY HAS FEWER THAN 150,000 RESIDENTS, A
LOCAL LICENSING BOARD MAY ISSUE ONE CLASS C–PCL LICENSE IN THE COUNTY.
(III) A LOCAL LICENSING BOARD MAY NOT ISSUE A NEW CLASS
C–PCL LICENSE FOR AN ESTABLISHMENT LOCATED WITHIN 5 MILES OF AN
ESTABLISHMENT WITH AN EXISTING CLASS C–PCL LICENSE.
(IV) THE ISSUANCE OF A CLASS C–PCL LICENSE IS SUBJECT TO
LOCAL REGULATIONS REGARDING THE TOTAL NUMBER OF ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES
LICENSES THAT MAY BE ISSUED IN A SINGLE JURISDICTION.
(3) A LOCAL LICENSING BOARD SHALL ESTABLISH A SCORING OR
WEIGHTED REVIEW PROCESS FOR APPLICATIONS FOR A CLASS C–PCL LICENSE,
WHICH SHALL CONSIDER:
(I) WHETHER THE APPLICANT QUALIFIES AS A SOCIAL EQUITY
APPLICANT;
(II) THE APPLICANT’S BUSINESS ACUMEN AND OPERATIONAL
CAPACITY;
(III) THE APPLICANT’S YEARS OF EXPERIENCE IN THE TOBACCO,
HOSPITALITY, OR RELATED INDUSTRY;
(IV) WHETHER THE APPLICANT RESIDES IN THE COUNTY OR
MUNICIPALITY IN WHICH THE LICENSE IS SOUGHT;
(V) ANY WRITTEN INPUT OR APPROVAL, AS REQUIRED BY THE
LOCAL LICENSING BOARD, FROM RELEVANT LOCAL STAKEHOLDERS, INCLUDING
THE COUNTY, A MUNICIPAL CORPORATION, OR A RECOGNIZED COMMUNITY OR
BUSINESS ASSOCIATION;

SENATE BILL 623 5
(VI) THE ECONOMIC BENEFIT THE PROPOSED BUSINESS IS
EXPECTED TO PROVIDE TO THE LOCAL JURISDICTION, INCLUDING JOB CREATION,
CAPITAL INVESTMENT, AND SUPPORT FOR LOCAL COMMERCE; AND
(VII) ANY OTHER FACTOR THAT THE LOCAL LICENSING BOARD
DETERMINES IS NECESSARY TO PROMOTE EQUITY, COMMUNITY COMPATIBILITY,
AND RESPONSIBLE BUSINESS OPERATIONS.
(D) (E) THE LICENSE AUTHORIZES THE HOLDER TO ALLOW A CUSTOMER
TO CONSUME ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES ON THE PREMISES SELL ALCOHOLIC
BEVERAGES FOR ON–PREMISES CONSUMPTION MONDAY THROUGH SUNDAY FROM
10 A.M. TO 1 A.M. THE FOLLOWING DAY IF:
(1) THE ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES ARE BROUGHT TO THE PREMISES BY
THE CUSTOMER;
(2) (1) THE CUSTOMER PURCHASES AND CONSUMES A PRODUCT
PREMIUM CIGAR OR PIPE TOBACCO SOLD BY THE LICENSE HOLDER DURING THE
TIME THE CUSTOMER IS ON THE PREMISES; AND
(3) (2) THE LICENSE HOLDER HAS AT LEAST ONE EMPLOYEE
PRESENT AND WORKING WHO IS CERTIFIED IN AN ALCOHOL AWARENESS PROGRAM
UNDER § 4–505 OF THIS TITLE.
(E) (F) (1) THE LICENSED PREMISES IS EXEMPT FROM THE
REQUIREMENTS OF THE CLEAN INDOOR AIR ACT UNDER § 24–505 OF THE HEALTH
– GENERAL ARTICLE.
(2) A LOCAL LICENSING BOARD SHALL REQUIRE:
(I) A LICENSE APPLICATION TO INCLUDE A BUILDING PLAN
DEMONSTRATING SUFFICIENT DETAILED SPECIFICATIONS FOR AIR FILTRATION
SYSTEMS AND EXHAUST SYSTEMS;
(II) A LICENSE HOLDER TO DISPLAY IN A CONSPICUOUS PLACE
THAT SMOKING IS ALLOWED ON THE PREMISES; AND
(III) EACH EMPLOYEE OF A LICENSED ESTABLISHMENT TO SIGN
AN ACKNOWLEDGMENT THAT ENUMERATES THE DANGERS OF SECONDHAND SMOKE
AND STATES THAT THE EMPLOYEE WILL BE SUBJECTED TO SECONDHAND SMOKE.
(3) AN ACKNOWLEDGMENT PROVIDED UNDER PARAGRAPH (2)(III) OF
THIS SUBSECTION SHALL STATE THAT THE ACKNOWLEDGMENT DOES NOT

SENATE BILL 623
CONSTITUTE A WAIVER OF THE EMPLOYEE’S RIGHTS UNDER FEDERAL, STATE, OR
LOCAL WORKPLACE SAFETY REGULATIONS.
(F) (G) (1) THE LICENSE HOLDER SHALL:
(1) HAVE AVERAGE DAILY RECEIPTS FROM THE SALE OF PREMIUM
CIGARS, PIPE TOBACCO, AND RELATED ACCESSORIES THAT ARE AT LEAST 70% OF
THE TOTAL DAILY RECEIPTS FROM THE ESTABLISHMENT; AND
(2) ANNUALLY SUBMIT TO THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR AND THE
LOCAL LICENSING BOARD, IN A FORM THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR REQUIRES, A
SALES RATIO COMPLIANCE REPORT A STATEMENT OF AVERAGE DAILY RECEIPTS
AND AN AFFIDAVIT OF A CERTIFIED PUBLIC ACCOUNTANT THAT VERIFY THAT THE
LICENSE HOLDER HAS MET THE REQUIREMENTS OF A TOBACCONIST UNDER §
16.5–101 OF THE BUSINESS REGULATION ARTICLE.
(2) IF, BASED ON THE ANNUAL SUBMISSION REQUIRED UNDER THIS
SUBSECTION OR ANY OTHER INFORMATION AVAILABLE TO THE LOCAL LICENSING
BOARD, THE LOCAL LICENSING BOARD DETERMINES THAT A LICENSE HOLDER DOES
NOT MEET THE REQUIREMENTS OF A TOBACCONIST UNDER § 16.5–101 OF THE
BUSINESS REGULATION ARTICLE, THE LOCAL LICENSING BOARD MAY REVOKE OR
SUSPEND THE CLASS C–PCL LICENSE OR OTHERWISE DISCIPLINE THE LICENSE
HOLDER IN ACCORDANCE WITH ENFORCEMENT POWERS PROVIDED UNDER THIS
ARTICLE AND ANY APPLICABLE LOCAL LAW OR REGULATION.
(H) A LICENSE HOLDER MAY NOT:
(1) ALLOW A PERSON TO USE CIGARETTES, ELECTRONIC SMOKING
DEVICES, OR CANNABIS ON THE LICENSED PREMISES;
(2) ALLOW AN INDIVIDUAL UNDER THE AGE OF 21 YEARS ON THE
LICENSED PREMISES;
(3) HAVE LIVE ENTERTAINMENT ON THE LICENSED PREMISES; OR
(4) OPERATE A COMMERCIAL KITCHEN ON THE LICENSED PREMISES.
(G) THE ANNUAL LICENSE FEE IS $100.
(I) A LOCAL LICENSING BOARD SHALL SET THE ANNUAL LICENSE FEE FOR
A CLASS C–PCL LICENSE BETWEEN $500 AND $2,500.
SUBTITLE 13. UNLICENSED ESTABLISHMENTS.

SENATE BILL 623 7
4–1301.
(A) (1) THIS SECTION APPLIES TO A TOBACCONIST:
(I) THAT ALLOWS ON–PREMISES CONSUMPTION OF PREMIUM
CIGARS AND PIPE TOBACCO;
(II) THAT DOES NOT HOLD AN ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES LICENSE;
AND
(III) THAT IS OPEN TO THE PUBLIC.
(2) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY IN MONTGOMERY COUNTY.
(B) A LOCAL LICENSING BOARD MAY AUTHORIZE THE OWNER OR OPERATOR
OF A TOBACCONIST TO ALLOW A CUSTOMER WHO IS AT LEAST 21 YEARS OLD TO
BRING ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES ONTO THE PREMISES FOR PERSONAL
CONSUMPTION, PROVIDED THE CUSTOMER CONCURRENTLY BUYS AND CONSUMES
TOBACCO PRODUCTS.
(C) IF THE OWNER OR OPERATOR OF THE TOBACCONIST ALLOWS THE
CONSUMPTION OF ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES ON THE PREMISES, THE OWNER OR
OPERATOR:
(1) MAY LIMIT THE AMOUNT AND TYPE OF ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES
THAT MAY BE CONSUMED ON THE PREMISES;
(2) SHALL REQUIRE THAT AT LEAST ONE EMPLOYEE WHO IS WORKING
AND PRESENT ON THE PREMISES HAS BEEN TRAINED IN AN ALCOHOL AWARENESS
PROGRAM UNDER § 4–505 OF THIS TITLE; AND
(3) MAY NOT ALLOW:
(I) AN INDIVIDUAL TO CONSUME ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES ON
THE PREMISES OF THE TOBACCONIST FROM 1 A.M. THROUGH 10 A.M.;
(II) A CUSTOMER TO DISTURB THE PEACE, SAFETY, AND
WELFARE OF THE COMMUNITY;
(III) A PERSON TO USE CIGARETTES, ELECTRONIC SMOKING
DEVICES, OR CANNABIS WHILE ON THE PREMISES; OR
(IV) AN INDIVIDUAL UNDER THE AGE OF 21 YEARS OLD TO
ENTER THE PREMISES.

SENATE BILL 623
(D) IF, BASED ON THE STATEMENT OF AVERAGE DAILY RECEIPTS AND
AFFIDAVIT REQUIRED UNDER § 16.5–206(C)(4) OF THE BUSINESS REGULATION
ARTICLE OR ANY OTHER INFORMATION AVAILABLE TO THE LOCAL LICENSING
BOARD, THE LOCAL LICENSING BOARD DETERMINES THAT A TOBACCONIST
AUTHORIZED TO ALLOW ON–PREMISES CONSUMPTION DOES NOT MEET THE
REQUIREMENTS OF A TOBACCONIST UNDER § 16.5–101 OF THE BUSINESS
REGULATION ARTICLE, THE LOCAL LICENSING BOARD MAY REVOKE THE
AUTHORIZATION TO ALLOW ON–PREMISES CONSUMPTION OR OTHERWISE
DISCIPLINE THE TOBACCONIST IN ACCORDANCE WITH ENFORCEMENT POWERS
PROVIDED UNDER THIS ARTICLE AND ANY APPLICABLE LOCAL LAW OR
REGULATION.
(E) THE LOCAL LICENSING BOARD SHALL NOTIFY THE EXECUTIVE
DIRECTOR OF EACH TOBACCONIST AUTHORIZED TO ALLOW ON–PREMISES
CONSUMPTION OF ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES UNDER THIS SECTION.
Article – Business Regulation
16.5–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(i) “Licensed tobacconist” means a person licensed by the clerk of a circuit court
under § 16.5–204(b) of this title to act as a tobacconist.
(j) (1) “Other tobacco products” means, except as provided in paragraph (3) of
this subsection, a product that is:
(i) intended for human consumption or likely to be consumed,
whether smoked, heated, chewed, absorbed, dissolved, inhaled, or ingested in any other
manner, and that is made of or derived from, or that contains:
1. tobacco; or
2. nicotine; or
(ii) a component or part used in a consumable product described
under item (i) of this paragraph.
(2) “Other tobacco products” includes:
(i) cigars, premium cigars, pipe tobacco, chewing tobacco, snuff, and
snus; and
(ii) filters, rolling papers, pipes, and hookahs.

SENATE BILL 623 9
(3) “Other tobacco products” does not include:
(i) cigarettes;
(ii) electronic smoking devices;
(iii) drugs, devices, or combination products authorized for sale by
the U.S. Food and Drug Administration under the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act;
or
(iv) tobacco pipes, as defined under § 11–104 of the Tax – General
Article.
(p) (1) “Pipe tobacco” means any tobacco that, because of its appearance, type,
packaging, or labeling, is suitable for use and likely to be offered to, or purchased by,
consumers as tobacco to smoke in a pipe.
(2) “PIPE TOBACCO” DOES NOT INCLUDE TOBACCO THAT IS
INTENDED FOR USE IN A HOOKAH OR SIMILAR SMOKING DEVICE.
(q) “Premium cigars” means cigars that:
(1) have hand–rolled wrappers made from whole tobacco leaves where the
filler, binder, and wrapper are made of all tobacco, and may include adhesives or other
materials used to maintain size, texture, or flavor; or
(2) are designated as premium cigars by the Executive Director by
regulation.
(t) “Tobacconist” means an other tobacco products business that derives at least
70% of its revenues, measured by average daily receipts, from the sale of [other tobacco
products] PREMIUM CIGARS, PIPE TOBACCO, and [tobacco–related] RELATED
accessories FOR ON–PREMISES OR OFF–PREMISES CONSUMPTION.
16.5–203.
(b) (1) An applicant for a license to act as an other tobacco products retailer or
a tobacconist:
(i) shall obtain a county license by submitting to the clerk an
application for each permanent or temporary place of business located in the same
enclosure and operated by the same applicant; and
(ii) except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, shall pay
to the clerk a fee of $15.

SENATE BILL 623
(2) A person who has a license issued under Title 16 of this article to act as
a cigarette retailer or to act as a special cigarette retailer is not required to pay the license
fee.
(3) The application shall:
(i) be made on the form that the clerk requires; and
(ii) contain the information that the Executive Director requires.
(4) IF AN APPLICANT FOR A LICENSE TO ACT AS A TOBACCONIST
INTENDS TO ALLOW ON–PREMISES CONSUMPTION OF PREMIUM CIGARS OR PIPE
TOBACCO, THE APPLICANT SHALL INCLUDE WITH THE APPLICATION SUBMITTED
UNDER THIS SUBSECTION A BUILDING PLAN DEMONSTRATING DETAILED
SPECIFICATIONS FOR AIR FILTRATION SYSTEMS AND EXHAUST SYSTEMS.
(e) (1) A licensee shall display a license in the way that the Executive Director
requires by regulation.
(2) IF SMOKING IS ALLOWED ON THE PREMISES, A LICENSEE SHALL
DISPLAY IN A CONSPICUOUS PLACE THAT SMOKING IS ALLOWED ON THE PREMISES.
(3) A TOBACCONIST LICENSEE SHALL RETAIN RECORDS RELATED TO
AVERAGE DAILY RECEIPTS OF THE TOBACCONIST FOR A MINIMUM OF 2 YEARS.
(4) A TOBACCONIST LICENSEE MAY NOT SELL ALCOHOLIC
BEVERAGES UNLESS THE TOBACCONIST LICENSEE ALSO HOLDS A CLASS C–PCL
LICENSE ISSUED UNDER § 4–1002 OF THE ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES AND CANNABIS
ARTICLE.
16.5–204.
(b) (1) [The] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, THE clerk of the circuit court shall issue to each applicant who meets the
requirements of this subtitle a license to act as an other tobacco products retailer or a
tobacconist.
(2) THE CLERK MAY NOT ISSUE A LICENSE TO ACT AS A TOBACCONIST
UNDER THIS SUBSECTION IF THE PLACE OF BUSINESS LISTED ON THE APPLICATION
FOR THE LICENSE IS ADJACENT TO SHARES A WALL WITH A LICENSED HEALTH CARE
FACILITY OR LICENSED CHILD CARE FACILITY.

SENATE BILL 623 11
(3) THE CLERK MAY RENEW A TOBACCONIST LICENSE ISSUED UNDER
THIS SECTION IF A LICENSED HEALTH CARE FACILITY OR LICENSED CHILD CARE
FACILITY RELOCATES TO SHARE A WALL WITH THE TOBACCONIST.
16.5–206.
(c) Before a license issued under this subtitle expires, the licensee may renew it
for an additional 1–year term, if the licensee:
(1) otherwise is entitled to be licensed;
(2) submits to the issuing official a renewal application on the form that
the issuing official requires; [and]
(3) pays to the issuing official the license fee required under § 16.5–203 of
this subtitle; AND
(4) IS RENEWING A LICENSE TO ACT AS A TOBACCONIST AND THE
LICENSEE FILES WITH THE CLERK OF THE CIRCUIT COURT A STATEMENT OF
AVERAGE DAILY RECEIPTS AND AN AFFIDAVIT OF A LICENSED CERTIFIED PUBLIC
ACCOUNTANT THAT VERIFY THE LICENSEE HAS MET THE REQUIREMENTS OF A
TOBACCONIST.
Article – Health – General
24–504.
Except as provided in § 24–505 of this subtitle, beginning on February 1, 2008, a
person may not smoke or vape in:
(1) An indoor area open to the public;
(2) An indoor place in which meetings are open to the public in accordance
with Title 3 of the General Provisions Article;
(3) A government–owned or government–operated means of mass
transportation including buses, vans, trains, taxicabs, and limousines; or
(4) An indoor place of employment.
24–505.
(A) This subtitle does not apply to:
(1) Private homes, residences, including residences used as a business or
place of employment, unless being used by a person who is licensed or registered under

SENATE BILL 623
Title 5, Subtitle 5 of the Family Law Article to provide child care, and private vehicles,
unless being used for the public transportation of children, or as part of health care or child
care transportation;
(2) A hotel or motel room rented to one or more guests as long as the total
percent of hotel or motel rooms being so used does not exceed 25%;
(3) A TOBACCONIST AS DEFINED IN § 16.5–101 OF THE BUSINESS
REGULATION ARTICLE retail tobacco business that is a sole proprietorship, limited
liability company, corporation, partnership, or other enterprise, in which:
(i) The primary activity is the retail sale of tobacco products and
accessories; and
(ii) The sale of other products [is incidental] CONSTITUTES NOT
MORE THAN 30% OF THE RETAIL TOBACCO BUSINESS’S GROSS ANNUAL REVENUE;
(4) Any facility of a manufacturer, importer, wholesaler, or distributor of
tobacco products or of any tobacco leaf dealer or processor in which employees of the
manufacturer, importer, wholesaler, distributor, or processor work or congregate; or
(5) A research or educational laboratory for the purpose of conducting
scientific research into the health effects of environmental smoke.
(B) THE ALCOHOL, TOBACCO, AND CANNABIS COMMISSION SHALL
MAINTAIN A REGISTRY OF RETAIL TOBACCO BUSINESSES THAT ARE EXEMPT FROM
THIS SUBTITLE IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, on or before July 1, 2028, and
each July 1 thereafter, a person who holds a license to act as a tobacconist under §
16.5–204 of the Business Regulation Article and holds a Class C–PCL alcoholic beverages
license, as authorized under Section 1 of this Act, shall provide documentation to the
Executive Director of the Alcohol, Tobacco, and Cannabis Commission that shows not less
than 70% of the annual gross revenue from the business operated under both licenses is
derived from the sale of other tobacco products and related accessories:
(a) Notwithstanding § 4–1002(d) of the Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis Article,
as enacted by Section 1 of this Act, a local alcoholic beverages license held by a tobacconist
prior to July 1, 2024, shall be converted to a Class C–PCL license under § 4–1002 of the
Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis Article, as enacted by Section 1 of this Act, regardless of
whether the conversion would cause the number of Class C–PCL licenses in the jurisdiction
to exceed the maximum number of licenses otherwise authorized under § 4–1002(d) of the
Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis Article, as enacted by Section 1 of this Act.
(b) A local licensing board may not suspend or revoke a converted Class C–PCL
license for noncompliance with sales percentages required under § 16.5–101(t) of the

SENATE BILL 623 13
Business Regulation Article, as enacted by Section 1 of this Act, before July 1, 2028, at
which point the license holder shall demonstrate compliance with this Act.
(c) For purposes of determining whether a local licensing board may issue any
additional Class C–PCL licenses in the jurisdiction, a local licensing board shall count any
Class C–PCL license converted under this section toward the total number of:
(1) Class C–PCL licenses allowed in a single jurisdiction under § 4–1002(d)
of the Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis Article, as enacted by Section 1 of this Act; and
(2) alcoholic beverages licenses issued in a jurisdiction if the jurisdiction
has local laws or regulations limiting the total amount of alcoholic beverages licenses issued
in the jurisdiction.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, the Board of License
Commissioners for Howard County and Baltimore County, when issuing a Class C–PCL
license under § 4–1002 of the Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis Article, as enacted by
Section 1 of this Act, shall give preference to a licensed tobacconist that has been operating
in Howard County and Baltimore County, for at least the 5 years immediately preceding
the effective date of this Act.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
2, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.